src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX q Y 1544
SFX q   0      -me             [aei]r
SFX q   0      -te             [aei]r
SFX q   0      -se             [aei]r
SFX q   0      -nos            [aei]r
SFX q   0      -vos            [aei]r
SFX q   0      -lhe            [aei]r
SFX q   0      -lhes           [aei]r
SFX q   r       -a             olir
SFX q   r       -as            olir
SFX q   r       -la            olir
SFX q   r       -las           olir
SFX q   r       -lo            olir
SFX q   r       -los           olir
SFX q   r       -lhe           olir
SFX q   r       -lhes          olir
SFX q   r       -me            olir
SFX q   r       -nos           olir
SFX q   r       -o             olir
SFX q   r       -os            olir
SFX q   r       -se            olir
SFX q   r       -te            olir
SFX q   r       -vos           olir
SFX q   r       a-a            olir
SFX q   r       a-as           olir
SFX q   r       a-lhe          olir
SFX q   r       a-lhes         olir
SFX q   r       a-me           olir
SFX q   r       a-nos          olir
SFX q   r       a-o            olir
SFX q   r       a-os           olir
SFX q   r       a-se           olir
SFX q   r       a-te           olir
SFX q   r       a-vos          olir
SFX q   r       am-lhe         olir
SFX q   r       am-lhes        olir
SFX q   r       am-me          olir
SFX q   r       am-na          olir
SFX q   r       am-nas         olir
SFX q   r       am-no          olir
SFX q   r       am-nos         olir
SFX q   r       am-se          olir
SFX q   r       am-te          olir
SFX q   r       am-vos         olir
SFX q   ir       amo-nos       olir
SFX q   ir       amo-vos       olir
SFX q   ir       amos-lhe      olir
SFX q   ir       amos-lhes     olir
SFX q   ir       amos-te       olir
SFX q   r       do-a           olir
SFX q   r       do-as          olir
SFX q   r       do-lhe         olir
SFX q   r       do-lhes        olir
SFX q   r       do-me          olir
SFX q   r       do-nos         olir
SFX q   r       do-o           olir
SFX q   r       do-os          olir
SFX q   r       do-se          olir
SFX q   r       do-te          olir
SFX q   r       do-vos         olir
SFX q   r       mo-nos         olir
SFX q   r       mo-vos         olir
SFX q   r       mos-lhe        olir
SFX q   r       mos-lhes       olir
SFX q   r       mos-te         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-a          olir
SFX q   r       ndo-as         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhe        olir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhes       olir
SFX q   r       ndo-me         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-nos        olir
SFX q   r       ndo-o          olir
SFX q   r       ndo-os         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-se         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-te         olir
SFX q   r       ndo-vos        olir
SFX q   0       a-a            olir
SFX q   0       a-as           olir
SFX q   0       a-lhe          olir
SFX q   0       a-lhes         olir
SFX q   0       a-me           olir
SFX q   0       a-nos          olir
SFX q   0       a-o            olir
SFX q   0       a-os           olir
SFX q   0       a-se           olir
SFX q   0       a-te           olir
SFX q   0       a-vos          olir
SFX q   0       -la-           olir
SFX q   0       -las-          olir
SFX q   0       -lhe-          olir
SFX q   0       -lhes-         olir
SFX q   0       -lo-           olir
SFX q   0       -los-          olir
SFX q   0       -me-           olir
SFX q   0       -nos-          olir
SFX q   0       -se-           olir
SFX q   0       -te-           olir
SFX q   0       -vos-          olir
SFX q   0       am-lhe         olir
SFX q   0       am-lhes        olir
SFX q   0       am-me          olir
SFX q   0       am-na          olir
SFX q   0       am-nas         olir
SFX q   0       am-no          olir
SFX q   0       am-nos         olir
SFX q   0       am-se          olir
SFX q   0       am-te          olir
SFX q   0       am-vos         olir
SFX q   0       -lhe- o        olir
SFX q   0       -lhes- o       olir
SFX q   0       -me- o         olir
SFX q   0       -na- o         olir
SFX q   0       -nas- o        olir
SFX q   0       -no- o         olir
SFX q   0       -nos- o        olir
SFX q   0       -se- o         olir
SFX q   0       -te- o         olir
SFX q   0       -vos- o        olir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ei        olir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ei       olir
SFX q   0       -me-ei         olir
SFX q   0       -nos-ei        olir
SFX q   0       -se-ei         olir
SFX q   0       -te-ei         olir
SFX q   0       -vos-ei        olir
SFX q   0       em-lhe         olir
SFX q   0       em-lhes        olir
SFX q   0       em-me          olir
SFX q   0       em-na          olir
SFX q   0       em-nas         olir
SFX q   0       em-no          olir
SFX q   0       em-nos         olir
SFX q   0       em-se          olir
SFX q   0       em-te          olir
SFX q   0       em-vos         olir
SFX q   0       -la-emos       olir
SFX q   0       -las-emos      olir
SFX q   0       -lhe-emos      olir
SFX q   0       -lhes-emos     olir
SFX q   0       -lo-emos       olir
SFX q   0       -los-emos      olir
SFX q   0       -nos-emos      olir
SFX q   0       -te-emos       olir
SFX q   0       -vos-emos      olir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ia        olir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ia       olir
SFX q   0       -me-ia         olir
SFX q   0       -nos-ia        olir
SFX q   0       -se-ia         olir
SFX q   0       -te-ia         olir
SFX q   0       -vos-ia        olir
SFX q   0       -lhe-iam       olir
SFX q   0       -lhes-iam      olir
SFX q   0       -me-iam        olir
SFX q   0       -nos-iam       olir
SFX q   0       -se-iam        olir
SFX q   0       -te-iam        olir
SFX q   0       -vos-iam       olir
SFX q   0        amo-nos       olir
SFX q   0        amo-vos       olir
SFX q   0        amos-lhe      olir
SFX q   0        amos-lhes     olir
SFX q   0        amos-te       olir
SFX q   0       mo-nos         olir
SFX q   0       mo-vos         olir
SFX q   0       mos-lhe        olir
SFX q   0       mos-lhes       olir
SFX q   0       mos-te         olir
SFX q   r       sse-a          olir
SFX q   r       sse-as         olir
SFX q   r       sse-lhe        olir
SFX q   r       sse-lhes       olir
SFX q   r       sse-me         olir
SFX q   r       sse-nos        olir
SFX q   r       sse-o          olir
SFX q   r       sse-os         olir
SFX q   r       sse-se         olir
SFX q   r       sse-te         olir
SFX q   r       sse-vos        olir
SFX q   r       ssem-lhe       olir
SFX q   r       ssem-lhes      olir
SFX q   r       ssem-me        olir
SFX q   r       ssem-na        olir
SFX q   r       ssem-nas       olir
SFX q   r       ssem-no        olir
SFX q   r       ssem-nos       olir
SFX q   r       ssem-te        olir
SFX q   r       ssem-vos       olir
SFX q   r       ste-a          olir
SFX q   r       ste-as         olir
SFX q   r       ste-lhe        olir
SFX q   r       ste-lhes       olir
SFX q   r       ste-me         olir
SFX q   r       ste-nos        olir
SFX q   r       ste-o          olir
SFX q   r       ste-os         olir
SFX q   r       ste-se         olir
SFX q   r       ste-te         olir
SFX q   r       ste-vos        olir
SFX q   r       u-a            olir
SFX q   r       u-as           olir
SFX q   r       u-lhe          olir
SFX q   r       u-lhes         olir
SFX q   r       u-me           olir
SFX q   r       u-nos          olir
SFX q   r       u-o            olir
SFX q   r       u-os           olir
SFX q   r       u-se           olir
SFX q   r       u-te           olir
SFX q   r       u-vos          olir
SFX q   r       -la            enir
SFX q   r       -las           enir
SFX q   r       -lhe           enir
SFX q   r       -lhes          enir
SFX q   r       -me            enir
SFX q   r       -nos           enir
SFX q   r       -lo            enir
SFX q   r       -los           enir
SFX q   r       -se            enir
SFX q   r       -te            enir
SFX q   r       -vos           enir
SFX q   r       a-a            enir
SFX q   r       a-as           enir
SFX q   r       a-lhe          enir
SFX q   r       a-lhes         enir
SFX q   r       a-me           enir
SFX q   r       a-nos          enir
SFX q   r       a-o            enir
SFX q   r       a-os           enir
SFX q   r       a-se           enir
SFX q   r       a-te           enir
SFX q   r       a-vos          enir
SFX q   r       am-lhe         enir
SFX q   r       am-lhes        enir
SFX q   r       am-me          enir
SFX q   r       am-na          enir
SFX q   r       am-nas         enir
SFX q   r       am-no          enir
SFX q   r       am-nos         enir
SFX q   r       am-se          enir
SFX q   r       am-te          enir
SFX q   r       am-vos         enir
SFX q   ir       amo-nos       enir
SFX q   ir       amo-vos       enir
SFX q   ir       amos-lhe      enir
SFX q   ir       amos-lhes     enir
SFX q   ir       amos-te       enir
SFX q   r       do-a           enir
SFX q   r       do-as          enir
SFX q   r       do-lhe         enir
SFX q   r       do-lhes        enir
SFX q   r       do-me          enir
SFX q   r       do-nos         enir
SFX q   r       do-o           enir
SFX q   r       do-os          enir
SFX q   r       do-se          enir
SFX q   r       do-te          enir
SFX q   r       do-vos         enir
SFX q   r       mo-nos         enir
SFX q   r       mo-vos         enir
SFX q   r       mos-lhe        enir
SFX q   r       mos-lhes       enir
SFX q   r       mos-te         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-a          enir
SFX q   r       ndo-as         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhe        enir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhes       enir
SFX q   r       ndo-me         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-nos        enir
SFX q   r       ndo-o          enir
SFX q   r       ndo-os         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-se         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-te         enir
SFX q   r       ndo-vos        enir
SFX q   0       a-a            enir
SFX q   0       a-as           enir
SFX q   0       a-lhe          enir
SFX q   0       a-lhes         enir
SFX q   0       a-me           enir
SFX q   0       a-nos          enir
SFX q   0       a-o            enir
SFX q   0       a-os           enir
SFX q   0       a-se           enir
SFX q   0       a-te           enir
SFX q   0       a-vos          enir
SFX q   0       -la-           enir
SFX q   0       -las-          enir
SFX q   0       -lhe-          enir
SFX q   0       -lhes-         enir
SFX q   0       -lo-           enir
SFX q   0       -los-          enir
SFX q   0       -me-           enir
SFX q   0       -nos-          enir
SFX q   0       -se-           enir
SFX q   0       -te-           enir
SFX q   0       -vos-          enir
SFX q   0       am-lhe         enir
SFX q   0       am-lhes        enir
SFX q   0       am-me          enir
SFX q   0       am-na          enir
SFX q   0       am-nas         enir
SFX q   0       am-no          enir
SFX q   0       am-nos         enir
SFX q   0       am-se          enir
SFX q   0       am-te          enir
SFX q   0       am-vos         enir
SFX q   0       -lhe- o        enir
SFX q   0       -lhes- o       enir
SFX q   0       -me- o         enir
SFX q   0       -na- o         enir
SFX q   0       -nas- o        enir
SFX q   0       -no- o         enir
SFX q   0       -nos- o        enir
SFX q   0       -se- o         enir
SFX q   0       -te- o         enir
SFX q   0       -vos- o        enir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ei        enir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ei       enir
SFX q   0       -me-ei         enir
SFX q   0       -nos-ei        enir
SFX q   0       -se-ei         enir
SFX q   0       -te-ei         enir
SFX q   0       -vos-ei        enir
SFX q   0       em-lhe         enir
SFX q   0       em-lhes        enir
SFX q   0       em-me          enir
SFX q   0       em-na          enir
SFX q   0       em-nas         enir
SFX q   0       em-no          enir
SFX q   0       em-nos         enir
SFX q   0       em-se          enir
SFX q   0       em-te          enir
SFX q   0       em-vos         enir
